<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881118-0011 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-18-88.f2.A1010</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 223 / Friday, November 18, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Mine Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">30 CFR Part 15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Requirements for Approval of Explosives and Sheathed Explosive Units</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Mine Safety and Health Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final Rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rule revises the Mine Safety and Health Administration's(MSHA) existing regulations for approval of explosives and adds new requirementsfor approval of sheathed explosive units. The revisions upgrade existingprovisions consistent with current technology, eliminate duplicative andunnecessary provisions, reorganize the existing requirements, and providealternative methods of compliance where possible.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATES: </T2>This final rule is effective January 17, 1989.However, those manufacturers proceeding under the provisions of the previousrule may file requests for approval or extension of approval of explosivesunder that rule until November 20, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Patricia W. Silvey, Director,Office of Standards, Regulations and Variances, MSHA, 4015 Wilson Boulevard,Room 613, Arlington, Virginia 22203, (703) 235-1910.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>MSHA is revising the existing requirements for approval of explosives andadding new requirements for approval of sheathed explosive units. Theserevisions are issued pursuant to section 508 of the Federal Mine Safetyand Health Act of 1977.On July 9, 1982, MSHA published an Advance Notice of proposed Rulemaking(ANPRM) in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (47 FR 30025) which announced a comprehensivereview of the underground coal mining standards in 30 CFR Part 75 and solicitedpublic comments. As part of the review, MSHA specifically sought commenton blasting and explosives standards and related approval regulations.On June 5, 1984, MSHA published a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (49 FR 23281) which announced the availabilityof its preproposal draft of revisions to the approval requirements forexplosives, sheathed explosive units, and related blasting equipment, andscheduled a public conference. The public conference was held July 11,1984, in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania and was well attended by representativesof the mining community. MSHA received written comments regarding its preproposaldraft from affected manufacturers and other segments of the mining community.After reviewing the comments received in response to the preproposal draft,MSHA published a proposed rule on November 12, 1986, in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 41046). The proposal set out revisionsto the existing regulations for approval of explosives in Part 15 and addednew requirements for approval of sheathed explosive units.On March 26, 1987 (52 FR 9670), MSHA published a notice of public hearingwhich outlined the major issues raised during the comment period. A publichearing was held April 22, 1987 in Bruceton, Pennsylvania during whichfurther comment on the proposal was received. A transcript of the proceedingwas taken and made available for public inspection. Following the publichearings, interested persons were allowed to submit supplementary statementsand data until the record closed on May 15, 1987.MSHA reviewed all written and oral statements submitted in response tothe proposed rule and at the public hearing. Comments were received fromall segments of the mining community including explosive manufacturers,trade associations and representatives of miners. This final rule was developedafter a full evaluation of the entire public record.The Agency's final rule addresses the comments received and is consistentwith Executive Order 12291, the Regulatory Flexibility Act, and the PaperworkReduction Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Discussion and Summary of the Final Rule</ITAG>The use of explosive in underground coal mines and certain undergroundmetal and nonmetal gassy mines continues to present a potentially seriousrisk of injuries and death to miners. One major hazard associated withthe use of explosives is the accidental ignition of mine gases and coaldust.The use of explosives approved as permissible reduce the potential forigniting flammable mixtures of methane gas or coal dust that may be presentin areas where blasting is performed. The flames produced by the detonationof approved explosives are significantly shorter in duration and lengththan black blasting powder or nonapproved dynamites which were primarilyused in blasting operations before approved explosives were required foruse undergound.MSHA's existing regulations governing the approval of explosives have notbeen revised since 1961. Since that time, technological advances have ledto the development of new types of explosives suitable for use in undergroundmines. Analytical techniques used by the Bureau of Mines in testing andevaluating explosives for MSHA have advanced comparably. This final ruleupdates the existing regulations to reflect this state-of-the-art technologyand deletes obsolete provisions.The final rule establishes three subparts in this Part 15. Subpart A containsgeneral approval procedures and requirements that are applicable to allsubparts. Subpart B revises the technical requirements for the testingand evaluation of explosives and Subpart C establishes new technical requirementsfor the approval of sheathed explosive units or other units to be firedoutside the confines of a borehole.Subpart B contains a new gallery test which provides for evaluation ofexplosives under conditions that are more representative of actual conditionsin underground mines. Other provisions revise the existing requirementsfor toxic gases that are produced by detonation of explosives and establisha new method for calculating the equivalent volume of various gases relativeto carbon monoxide. This is based on the threshold limit values, time weightedaverage (TLV-TWA) included for these gases in the chemical substances sectionof the publication of the American Conference of Governmental IndustrialHygienists (ACGIH) entitled ``TLV's, Threshold Limit Values and BiologicalExposure Indices for 1988-1989 (`TLV Booklet').''The provisions in Subpart C are new and establish requirements for theapproval of sheathed explosive units or other units to be fired outsidethe confines of a borehole. The sheathed unit, intended for use withoutbeing confined in a borehole, is designed so that it will not ignite aflammable mixture of methane and/or coal dust when fired. It has been developedfor use in dislodging loose roof slabs and overhangs, rockfall leveling,slab or boulder breaking and in other situations where the unconfined applicationof explosives is appropriate to improve mine conditions.In the preamble to the proposed rule for Part 15, MSHA referenced its rulemakingon 30 CFR Part 7. There, the Agency proposed that for approval of certainproducts the applicant or a third party selected by the applicant wouldconduct the required testing according to test procedures set forth bythe Agency and require certification of test results by the applicant.MSHA specifically solicited comments as to whether the Agency should continuetesting for approval of explosives and sheathed explosive units or if thetesting under Part 15 might more appropriately be conducted by applicantsor third parties and, therefore, included as a subpart under Part 7. TheAgency was especially interested in information concerning the industry'scapability with regard to facilities for conducting the required testsfor approval of explosives and sheathed explosive units. In respondingto this issue commenters stated that explosives and sheathed explosiveunits should not be included as products under Part 7. They believed thatthe concept of applicant or third-party testing would not be feasible inthe explosives industry at this time since no manufacturer or third-partytest facility had the capability to perform all the required tests. Therefore,as recommended by commenters, the final rule provides for continued Agencytesting of products addressed by Part 15.The final rule deletes existing andSection;15.24 concerning miscellaneoustests as those tests were used for research purposes and were not approvalrelated. It also deletes the existing provisions in Part 15 which describethe blasting practices that must be followed in underground coal mines.These provisions are addressed in revisions to the safety standards in30 CFR Part 75 which are being published simultaneously with this finalrule.The term ``permissible'' which is used in the existing standards was replacedin the proposal with the term ``approved.'' Commenters objected to thechange. They stated that the term ``permissible'' has been used for over75 years and is well recognized throughout the mining industry. MSHA continuesto believe that the terminology used to identify products which have beenexamined by the Agency to determine conformity with regulatory requirementsmust be standardized. The term which most appropriately reflects MSHA'saction in this area is ``approved.'' Therefore, the phrase ``approved explosive''will be used in revised Part 15 in lieu of ``permissible explosive.'' However,since explosives approved as permissible under the Part 15 regulationsin effect prior to the effective date of this rule may continue to be manufacturedand used in underground mines requiring approved explosives, the safetystandard in Part 75 will define the term ``permissible explosive'' as oneapproved by MSHA. Further, a definition of ``approval'' consistent withthe definition of this term in this part is added to Subpart N of Part75.Tests and evaluations made under this part will be performed for MSHA bythe Bureau of Mines, U.S. Department of the Interior (Bureau). The Bureautesting facility is located near Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Discussion of the Subparts </ITAG>The following section-by-section analysis discusses each provision of thesubparts of the final rule and addresses the comments received on the proposal.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG>Section 15.1 Purpose and effectivedates. This provision, derived from existing andSection;15.1, revises and simplifiesthe statement of purpose and more accurately reflects the scope of Part15. It clarifies that the requirements set forth in the final rule arefor approval of explosives and sheathed explosives units for use in undergroundcoal mines and certain underground metal and nonmetal gassy mines. It alsospecifies the effective date applicable to the explosives and sheathedexplosive units program. MSHA realizes that applicants need a phase-inor transition period when changing from previous to new revised approvalregulations for products and two approaches for handling the transitionwere delineated in the proposal. The Agency proposed a delay of one yearafter publication of the final rule for the explosives approval requirementsin Subpart B to take effect. However, Subpart A containing general provisionsand Subpart C setting approval requirements for sheathed explosive unitswere to be effective 30 days after publication of the final rule so sheathedunits could be made available for use in underground mines as quickly aspossible. Alternatively, MSHA indicated it was considering making all subpartsof the regulation, including the new revised explosives requirements inSubpart B, take effect 30 days after publication of the final rule. However,manufacturers with explosives applications in process could file requestsfor approval or extension of approval under the previous regulations untilone year after the effective date of the new regulations. During this one-yearphase-in period, applicants could submit an approval request for explosivesunder either the previous regulation or the new revised regulation. The comments received on this question generally favored the second approach.Commenters stated that it provided manufacturers with greater flexibilitysince they could complete applications currently in process under the previousregulation while at the same time planning compliance with or even submittingapplications under the new regulations immediately. In addition, they favoredthis approach since it followed the transition procedure set forth in MSHA'sPart 7 regulations. Consistent with the comments as well as with the approach taken on thisissue in Part 7, the final rule provides that all subparts of the revisedPart 15 regulation take effect 60 days after publication. It also providesthat manufacturers proceeding under the provisions of the previous regulationmay request approval or extension of approval of explosives under thatregulation until one year from the effective date of the revisions. Afterthe one-year period, all applications for approval or extension of approvalof explosives or sheathed explosive units will be evaluated under the revisedPart 15. The final rule also provides that explosives issued an approvalunder regulations in place prior to the effective date of these revisions,and in compliance with those regulations, could continue to be manufacturedas long as no changes were made. Changes to previously approved explosivesmust be submitted as new approvals under the revisions to Part 15 set outin this final rule. This provision was added in response to commenterswho sought clarification as to how the Agency intended to treat previouslyapproved explosives manufactured in compliance with prior explosives approvalregulations. With regard to the question of what standards would be usedin auditing these explosives, MSHA will audit explosives based on the technicalrequirements upon which the approval was issued. Language reflecting thisposition is incorporated in andSection;15.10 Post-Approval Product Audit.Section 15.2 Definitions The following definitions apply to Part 15 approvals. They are designedto clarify the requirements of Part 15 and respond to the issues identifiedby commenters. <T3>Applicant. </T3>This term, which is derived from the existing standards,identifies the party seeking approval of an explosive or sheathed explosiveunit under this part. <T3>Approval. </T3>This term replaces the existing phrase ``certificateof approval.'' It is used to describe a written document issued by MSHAwhich states that an explosive or explosive unit meets the requirementsof this part and which authorizes the use of an approval marking identifyingthe explosive or explosive unit as approved as permissible. <T3>Explosive. </T3>This definition revises the existing definition tomore clearly indicate the type of products for which this part is intended.The existing definition's reference to ``blasting devices as defined inPart 17 of this subchapter,'' has not been included in the final rule sincethese devices are no longer manufactured or used in underground mines.<T3>Extension of approval. </T3>This phrase, which is new, is used to describea written document issued by MSHA that states that a change to a previouslyapproved explosive or sheathed explosive unit meets the requirements ofthis part. It is based on existing terminology that is used when changesare made on products approved in accordance with 30 CFR, Parts 18 through36. <T3>Minimum product firing temperature. </T3>This term is new and meansthe lowest product temperature at which an explosive is approved for use.It was not included in the proposal, but was added to the final rule inresponse to commenters who sought clarification as to whether firing temperaturein the air-gap sensitivity test referred to product temperature or ambienttemperature. <T3>Post-approval product audit. </T3>This term is new and is used to describeMSHA's examination and testing, or both, of approved explosives or explosiveunits to determine whether those products meet the technical requirementsand have been manufactured as approved. Some commenters stated that itwas unclear what was meant by the phrase ``to determine whether those productsmeet the requirements of the approval,'' used in the proposed definitionfor post-approval product audit. The final rule revises the proposed definitionto clarify that the Agency will conduct such audits to determine whetherthe products meet the technical requirements in Part 15 and have been manufacturedas approved. Some commenters recommended that the term ``audit'' be replaced with theterm ``check.'' They stated that the word ``audit'' could be interpreteddifferently in the future and subject manufacturers to extensive audits.The Agency believes that the term ``audit'' more accurately describes theprocess that will be used to determine compliance with these requirements.<T3>Sheath. </T3>This term, which is new, is used to describe that portionof a sheathed explosive unit which will be dispersed to form a flame inhibitingcloud upon firing of the explosives contained in the sheathed unit. <T3>Sheathed explosive unit. </T3>This term is new and is used to describean explosive device that can be fired without being confined in a borehole.It is designed so that it will not ignite a flammable mixture of methaneor coal dust when fired. <T3>Test detonator. </T3>This term has a new definition which identifiesthe types of detonators that will be used to test explosives submittedfor approval under this part. The existing definition which specifies thatthese detonators contain a base charge of 0.25andplusmin;0.02 gram of pentaerythritoltetranitrate (PETN) is replaced since this strength detonator is no longerbeing manufactured for commercial use. Several commenters recommended that a ``test detonator'' be defined asan ``instantaneous electric detonator with a copper-alloy shell and ironor copper leg wires that is commercially available for use in undergroundcoal mines.'' They further recommended that a test detonator contain ``abase charge of 0.40-0.45 gram of pentaerythritol tetranitrate (PETN) pressedto a specific gravity of 1.4 g/cc and primed with standard weight of primer.''These commenters stated that since test detonators are to be used for determiningair-gap sensitivity of an explosive, it is imperative that detonators witha standard base charge be specified. Detonators with a base charge of 0.40-0.45 gram PETN, which is a No. 8strength detonator, is the minimum strength detonator currently being manufacturedin the United States for underground gassy mines. Detonators that havean initiating strength equivalent to that of a detonator with a base chargeof 0.40-0.45 gram PETN will be used by the Agency to conduct the appropriatetests under this final rule. Specialized systems using technology otherthan that identified in this rule will be addressed through the new technologyprovisions in andSection;andSection;15.20(i) and 15.30(g). The safe performanceof approved explosives or shethed units can be significantly affected ifthe proper strength detonator is not used. Therefore, a provision has beenadded in andSection;15.7 on approval marking to require the labeling forexplosives and sheathed units to state the test detonator strength usedin the approval testing. This will assist operators in selecting the properstrength detonator to use with explosives and sheathed explosive unitsand will also assist approval holders by ensuring that the same strengthdetonator is used by MSHA for approval and audit testing. During the course of rulemaking on Part 15, a commenter urged that MSHAdevelop approval regulations for detonators used in the initiation of approvedexplosives in underground mines. MSHA, after considering the need to establishapproval requirements for detonators, will seek to include an approvalschedule for detonators in its regulatory program. The definitions in the existing regulations for ``basic specifications,''``poisonous gases,'' ``ingredients,'' ``Bureau,'' ``MESA,'' and ``MSHA''are not included in the final rule because they are commonly known throughoutthe mining community. Section 15.3 Observers at tests and evaluations. This standard is derived from existing andSection;15.9 and is intended toprotect proprietary information which could be available to observers attests and evaluations conducted under this part. The final rule provides that only MSHA and Bureau of Mines personnel, representativesof the applicant, and such other persons agreed upon by MSHA and the applicantare permitted to be present during the tests and evaluations conductedunder Part 15. In response to comments, andSection;15.3 specifies that ``MSHAand Bureau of Mines personnel'' instead of ``government personnel'' maybe present during testing and evaluation. This change reflects MSHA's viewthat only necessary persons be present when the tests and evaluations areperformed. This will minimize the possibility of any inadvertent releaseof proprietary information. As was indicated in the proposal, existing andSection;15.8 which addressesconsultation between a prospective applicant and personnel at MSHA's Approvaland Certification Center has been deleted in the final rule. A commenterraised concerns as to whether MSHA intends to continue providing appropriateconsultation services at no cost to the applicant. Manufacturers may consultwith MSHA regarding the test procedures and requirements for explosivesand sheathed explosive units prior to submission of an application forapproval under Part 15. However, once an application is received for action,costs will be charged pursuant to Part 5, including the time attributableto consultation. Section 15.4 Application procedures and requirements. This section, which is derived from existing andSection;andSection;15.3 and15.15, sets forth the procedures and requirements for requesting approvalof explosives or sheathed explosive units. It does not contain specificprovisions concerning the fees to be charged for approval of explosivesand sheathed explosive units. Instead, andSection;15.4(b) requires that feescalculated pursuant to Part 5, Fees for Testing, Evaluation, and Approvalof Mining Products, (52 FR 17506) be submitted with each application forapproval or extension of approval. In a separate rulemaking, MSHA published a new Part 5 (Fees for Testing,Evaluation, and Approval of Mining Products) in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on May 8, 1987 (52 FR 17506). That final rulerevised the Agency's existing system of charging user fees for the testing,evaluation and approval of products manufactured for use in undergroundmines. Fees for MSHA processing of an application under Part 15 will besubject to an hourly rate charge for evaluation and flat rate charges fortests. On hourly rate actions, applicants will be billed for the fee whenprocessing of the action is completed. The final fee will include, in additionto the hourly rate and flat test rate charges, actual travel and transportationexpenses incurred when testing and evaluation requires the investigatorto travel to the manufacturing or installation site. The Agency may considerconverting to a flat fee schedule, payable with the application, afterreviewing its hourly rate data. MSHA will charge $33 per hour and an application fee of $100 for processingrequests for approval or extension of approval for explosives under SubpartB and sheathed units under Subpart C. Flat rate fees for tests are shownin the table below. The test fees for explosives are revised from thoselisted in the final rule for Part 5 based on the revisions to the approvalregulation. Test fees for sheathed units are new rates developed to recovercosts of processing and testing. The fee schedule published in May 1987will apply to applications for approval or extension of approval filedunder the previous Part 15 regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">Part 15_Fees For Approval of Explosives and Sheathed Explosive Units</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s60,6</C><T4>Approval of Explosives </T4><H1>Test </H1><H1>Fee</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Weigh-in <D>$420</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Physical examination <D>295</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chemical analysis <D>1,797</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Air Gap: Minimum product firing temperature <D>418</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Air Gap: Room temperature <D>320</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pendulum friction <D>148</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Detonation rate <D>320</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gallery Test 7 <D>4,917</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gallery Test 8 <D>3,537</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Toxic gases (large chamber) <D>732</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s60,6</C><T4>Approval of Sheathed Explosive Units</T4><H1>Test </H1><H1>Fee</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Physical examination <D>$128</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chemical analysis <D>1,044</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gallery Test 9 <D>1,944</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gallery Test 10 <D>1,944</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gallery Test 11 <D>1,944</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gallery Test 12 <D>1,944</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Drop Test <D>648</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Temperature Effects/Detonation <D>672</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Toxic Gases <D>580</D></ITAG></ITAG>The final rule organizes the application procedures into the three kindsof approval actions an applicant may request under Part 15: an originalapproval, a subsequent approval of a similar product, and extension ofapproval. In requesting an original (first time) approval for an explosiveor sheathed explosive unit, MSHA will require the submission of all informationnecessary to evaluate all facets of the explosive or sheathed explosiveunit as it relates to the approval requirements. If, after receipt of anoriginal approval, the applicant requests subsequent approval of similarproduct or an extension of approval for the original product, the applicantwill not be required to submit documentation duplicative of previouslysubmitted information. Only information related to changes in the previouslyapproved product will be required, avoiding unnecessary paperwork. The final rule retains the existing requirement that changes in the specificationsof a previously approved explosive or sheathed explosive unit must be approvedby MSHA. This will avoid changes being made that could affect the safeperformance of the explosive or sheathed explosive unit. Section 15.4(c) (2) of the final rule requires applicants requesting approvalof explosives to include ``a laboratory number or other suitable designationidentifying the explosive'' at the time of application with the brand ortrade name provided prior to issuance of approval. This constitutes a changefrom the proposal which required applicants to submit, at the time of application,the brand or trade name under which the explosive would be marketed ifapproved. Several commenters objected, however, pointing out that applicantsfrequently submit several explosive candidates for testing and do not determinethe brand or trade name of the candidates until completion of the approvaltests. Thus, applicants are no longer required to submit the brand or tradename at the time an application is submitted, but instead can provide itlater. However, an approval will not be issued until the brand or tradename has been received by MSHA. The final rule revises the existing requirement concerning assignment ofdifferent brand or trade names for approved explosives which specifiesthat, when a change in chemical composition is approved, the former compositionshall not be used again unless reapproved by MSHA. Under andSection;15.4(f)(3)MSHA may require that a new or changed explosive or sheathed explosiveunit be distinguishable from those associated with the former composition.This change recognizes that methods, other than different brand or tradenames, could be used to identify products which perform differently andis based on MSHA's view that reapproval of an explosive or sheathed explosiveunit, which otherwise performs safely, is not necessary because of a namechange. The existing requirement that the strength of the exposive be determinedby the ballistic mortar test has been deleted in the final rule. MSHA hasdetermined that it is not essential to know the strength of the explosiveto determine whether the explosive will perform safely. In addition, ofthe numerous field samples of approved explosives that have been testedover the last ten years, all were found to be in compliance with the strengthrequirements. This was true even when the field samples were not in compliancewith other specifications of the approval. Section 15.5 Test samples.The final rule reviews and updates the provisions of existing andSection;andSection;15.5 and 15.6 concerning the shipment, quantity, and quality of explosivesand sheathed explosive units to be submitted for testing. The final ruleretains, with clarifying changes, provisions from the existing regulationsthat prohibit shipment of samples until notification from MSHA, requirestorage of samples in a magazine for at least 30 days prior to testingand, establish when test samples not be tested because of their chemicalcomposition or condition. New provisions have been added specifying thatexplosives will not be tested that use aluminum clips to seal explosivecartridges, contain any combination or perchlorate and aluminum, containmore than 5 percent perchlorate, or contain any perchlorate and less than5 percent water. Section 15.5(a) requires the applicant, upon request by MSHA, to submitsamples of explosives and sheathed explosive units for testing and evaluationby MSHA. The section also sets forth the quantities of these products tobe submitted. Under andSection; 15.5(a)(2), the applicant is required to submit 70 poundsof 1-\1/4\-inch diameter explosives and additional cartridges accordingto a formula based on cartridge length. This formula constitutes a changefrom the proposal which increased the existing requirement of explosivesto be submitted for testing from 100 to 150 pounds. Use of the formulamethod will provide a more accurate number of explosives needed for testing,while at the same time providing the increased quantity of explosives necessaryto conduct the new minimum product firing temperature tests included inthe final rule. Section 15.5(a)(3) also uses a formula to specify the numberof cartridges in diameters less than 1-\1/4\ inches that must be submittedfor testing. The existing requirement that applicants submit explosive cartridges in8-inch lengths has been deleted in the final rule. This will allow applicantsthe flexibility to submit samples that are representative of the cartridgelengths to be manufactured. Under andSection; 15.5(b), MSHA will not test explosives or sheathed explosiveunits that: (1) Contain chlorites, chlorates, or substances that reactover an extended period and cause degradation of the explosive or sheathedunit; (2) are chemically unstable; (3) show leakage; (4) use aluminum clipsto seal the cartridge; (5) contain any combination of perchlorate and aluminum;(6) contain more than 5 percent perchlorate; or (7) contain any perchlorateand less than 5 percent water. One commenter suggested that explosive cartridges with aluminum clips bepermitted, stating that the hazard of incendivity associated with aluminumclips is not sufficient to warrant their exclusion. It is generally recognizedby the mining community, however, that aluminum can present an incendivityhazard, particularly when contacting rusty metal, and should not be usedin areas where there is a possibility of igniting methane or coal dust.Therefore, the final rule continues to prohibit testing of explosive cartridgeswith aluminum clips. The final rule retains the provision specifying that MSHA will not testan explosive containing more than 5 percent perchlorate. Perchlorate isan ester or salt of perchloric acid which is used in explosives to enhancesensitivity, primarily to improve the low temperature performance of approvedexplosives. Several commenters objected to this provision stating thatit was unduly designed restrictive. They further stated that MSHA shouldconsider approval of explosives that contain more than 5 percent perchlorateproviding that the manufacturer can show that such explosives are chemicallystable, do not degrade or react over an extended time in storage and meetall the requirements for sensitivity and performance. In addition, onecommenter indicated that it had products containing up to 10 percent perchloratewhich had good safety stability histories. These products had been DOTclassified which included impact and thermal stability testing. As indicated in the proposal, research conducted by the Bureau of Minesshows that the use of perchlorate in approved explosives does not resultin instability of the explosive when the amount of perchlorate does notexceed 5 percent and the explosive contains 5 percent or more of water.However, at that time, neither the Bureau of Mines nor MSHA was aware ofany data or information on whether explosives with more than 5 percentperchlorate could be used safely and therefore, specifically requestedthat information or data be provided on the issue. Although commentersgenerally objected to the prohibition, sufficient data or information wasnot received to allow MSHA to establish appropriate tests or criteria forevaluating such explosives. As a result, the final rule retains the prohibitionagainst testing of explosives with more than 5 percent perchlorate. However, explosives with more than 5 percent perchlorate may be evaluatedunder the new technology provision in andSection; 15.20(i) of the final rule.Under this provision, consideration would be given to evaluating thoseproducts under United Nations Test Series 3 which includes an impact testfor sensitivity. The Agency is also considering the need to store theseexplosives for an extended period prior to performing tests to determinewhether the chemical stability has been affected by the increased proportionof perchlorate and whether the explosive will degrade or react over anextended time. MSHA will expect manufacturers requesting approval of explosiveswith more than 5 percent perchlocate under andSection; 15.20(i) to addressthese issues through suggested test criteria and procedures. Once MSHA approves and explosive with more than 5 percent perchlorate underthe new technology provision, the Agency will make the modified tests andrequirements used by MSHA to evaluate such explosive available to manufacturersand other interested persons. If over a period of time MSHA receives anumber of applications for explosives with more than 5 percent perchlorate,MSHA will revise the explosive approval regulations in Part 15 throughthe rulemaking process to allow such explosives. Commenters also raised questions concerning the prohibition of any combinationof perchlorate and aluminum in explosives, finding this provision was alsodesign restrictive. Further, one manufacturer stated that it had producedexplosives containing aluminum and perchlorate with good safety stabilityhistories. In combining perchlorate and aluminum in explosives, the perchlorateis an oxidizer and the aluminum is a highly efficient fuel source whichalso acts as the sensitizer. The perchlorate can be sensitive to frictionthat may result from impact in handling, and in the presence of aluminumfor fuel, the resistance to explosion may not provide the assurance ofsafety necessary to gassy underground mines. Accordingly, the final ruleretains the prohibition against testing of explosives composed of a combinationof perchlorate and aluminum. However, as with explosives containing morethan 5 percent perchlorate, MSHA will evaluate explosives incorporatinga combination of perchlorate and aluminum under the new technology provisionin andSection; 15.20(i).Section 15.5(c) requires explosives and sheathed explosives units to bestored prior to testing. It retains the existing requirement for storagein a magazine for at least 30 days before gallery tests are conducted.This storage period is designed to provide an indication of explosive orexplosive unit stability so MSHA can determine whether the character ofthe product has changed.Section 15.6 Issuance of approval.This section is derived from existing andSection; 15.13 and specifies theactions to be taken by MSHA upon review of applications for approval ofexplosives and sheathed explosive units. The final rule provides that MSHAwill issue an approval or a notice denying approval after tests and evaluationshave been completed. The approval or notice denying approval will be inwriting.The proposed rule deleted the existing requirement that applicants be provideda written report summarizing the results of the investigation of the application.Commenters objected to this deletion, stating that the report provideduseful information to manufacturers concerning their products. This report,however, has proved most useful to applicants when approval of an explosiveapplication was denied by MSHA as it set forth the rationale for denial.MSHAS believes that manufacturers should be given the reasons for denialof an approval. Therefore, paragraph (a) of the final rule provides, inlieu of an investigative report, that a notice denying approval must specifythe reasons for MSHA's action.Several commenters also suggested that MSHA be required to complete allapproval actions within 90 days. Another commenter strongly disagreed,stating that an approval deadline would only serve to cause shortcuts intesting procedures and could result in products being approved for us ingassy underground mines that do not meet the technical requirements.The final rule does not established a time limit for the completion offinal actions on requests for approval of explosives and sheathed explosiveunits due to the complexity and variables involved in the approval process.Variables such as the number of applications received for approval arebeyond the control of MSHA. An approval deadline is especially inappropriategiven that the final rule allows approval of explosives or sheathed unitsthat incorporate new technology or new applications of existing technologyas established in andSection;andSection; 15.20(i) and 15.30(g). Concerningthe timing of the approval process, the Agency is aware that excessivedelay could have an adverse affect on the quality and integrity of theproduct being tested. MSHA has eliminated the performance of nonapproval-relatedtests and has simplified reports on approval actions to reduce processingtime. The total time for processing of approval actions for explosiveswas decreased by 18 percent in fiscal year 1988 from the previous year.Streamlining internal approval procedures will continue to be an MSHA priority.Section 15.6(b) prohibits applicants for approval from advertising or otherwiserepresenting an explosive or sheathed explosive unit as approved untilMSHA has issued an approval. This provision, which is new, is consistentwith similar prohibitions applicable to applicants for approval under otherMSHA approval regulations such as 30 CFR Part 18.Section 15.7 Approval marking.This section is derived from existing andSection; 15.14 and provides forlabeling of approved explosives and sheathed explosive units. The finalrule retains existing requirements that approved explosives be marketedonly under the brand or trade name specified in the approval and that thewrapper of each cartridge as well as each case of explosives bear a labelindicating that the explosive is approved. These requirements also applyto sheathed explosive units. Added to the approval marking provision inthe final rule is the requirement that the explosive and sheathed unitcontain the test detonator strength used in the approval testing, and theminimum product firing temperature.The final rule requires that the wrapper of each cartridge and each caseof approved explosives and the outer covering of each sheathed explosiveunit and each case of approved sheathed explosive units be labeled withthe minimum product firing temperature. The preproposal draft would haverequired each case of approved explosives and sheathed explosive unitsto be labeled with the minimum firing temperature. The proposal retainedthe performance requirement for a mimimum firing temperature but the mannerof conveying this information was to be determined by explosive manufacturers.As discussed and specified in the new regulations for Part 75, Safety Standardsfor Explosives and Blasting, explosives or sheathed explosive units mustnot be fired when the product is below the minimum product firing temperature.One commenter said that explosives labeled with the minimum firing temperaturecould cause users to confuse outside air temperature with the temperatureof the product. The Agency has clarified this issue by defining the minimumfiring temperature as the lowest product temperature at which the explosiveor sheathed explosive unit is approved for use. The commenter also statedthat the labeling requirement would be more effectively accomplished throughinserting detailed instructions in each case of explosives as to storageand use which is current practice and through user education and training.However, the Agency has eliminated the case insert in the final rule anddoes not believe that the case insert served to effectively provide guidanceto the blaster. MSHA accident data shows failure by the blaster to followsafe blasting practices or regulations to be a contributing factor in over80 percent of the fatal blasting accidents from 1978 through 1984. Uponfurther consideration of this information, MSHA has determined that blastersrequire more specific guidance in the safe handling and use of explosives.The labeling of each explosive cartridge and sheathed unit with the minimumproduct firing temperature readily provides the blaster with the informationon-site without having to read through a case insert which is very difficultto accomplish in the underground mining environment. The inclusion of thisprovision in the final rule transmits information necessary for user compliancewith the explosives and blasting standards in Part 75. Accordingly, explosivesand sheathed unit approval labels must provide the minimum firing temperaturefor the product. The approval label must also provide the test detonator strength used inthe approval testing of the explosive or sheathed unit. The safe performanceof approved explosives or sheathed units can be significantly affectedif the proper strength detonator is not used when blasting. Section 1310(e)of Part 75 requires that detonators have sufficient strength to initiatethe explosives being used. The inclusion of the test detonator strengthon the approval label will assist blasters in selecting the proper strengthdetonator to use with explosives and sheathed units and thus provide importantinformation for user compliance with blasting safety standards. Moreover,it will ensure that the same strength detonator is used for post-approvalaudit testing as that used during the initial approval testing. As noted above, the existing requirements for a case insert, warning theuser that the explosive is approved only when used in conformance withthe requirements of Part 15, is not included in the final rule. Requirementsgoverning the use of explosives are appropriately included in related safetystandards and should not be addressed in requirements for approval of explosives.Section 15.8 Quality assurance. This section is derived from existing andSection;15.14, except paragraph(b) which is new. The MSHA approval label is relied upon in the miningcommunity as an indication that the product is safe for use in mines. Underthe final rule, the approval-holder is required to manufacture the productin accordance with the specifications of the approval and report to MSHAany knowledge of explosives or sheathed explosive units distributed thatdo not comply with the approval. One commenter objected to the proposal's deletion of a provision requiringapplicants to submit detailed quality control plans and quality controlinspection and testing instructions for acceptance by MSHA. Any changesto them would also have been subject to MSHA acceptance. MSHA continuesto believe that there is a need for quality control in the production ofapproved explosive products. For this reason, the final rule retains thebasic requirement that approved explosives and sheathed explosive unitsbe manufactured in accordance with the approval. The design and implementationof a quality assurance program to accomplish this, however, is the manufacturer'sresponsibility and, therefore, has not been made subject to review or acceptanceby MSHA. Adherence to the final rule's requirements for quality assurance will providesubstantial protection against the distribution of defective explosiveproducts. However, MSHA recognizes that this can occur. In such an event,andSection;15.8(b) requires the approval-holder to report immediately tothe Agency any knowledge that explosives or sheathed explosive units havebeen distributed which do not meet the requirements upon which the approvalis based. This knowledge could come from the results of audits conductedby the approval-holder, reports from users, or other sources. Upon receivingsuch a report, MSHA will work with the approval-holder to implement appropriatecorrective action. Commenters requested that MSHA provide guidance on how approval-holderswould comply with the requirement to report knowledge of distributed explosivesor sheathed explosive units which did not meet the technical requirements.Since such explosive products can create a hazard, immediate notificationshould be by expeditious means, such as by telephone. The notificationshould include a description of the nature and extent of the problem, thelocations where the explosives or sheathed explosive units have been distributed,and the approval-holder's plans for corrective action. Corrective actionmay include recalling the explosive products or restricting use of thempending conformance with the approval specifications. MSHA will reviewall of the information provided, including the approval-holder's programof corrective action. If the program is inadequate, MSHA will work withthe manufacturer to develop a more appropriate program. If appropriatecorrective action cannot be agreed upon by the approval-holder and MSHA,the Agency may seek revocation of the approval, or other action as necessary.Section 15.9 Disclosure of information. This section is derived from existing andSection;andSection;5.9 and 15.17 whichaddress the disclosure of information on explosives tested and evaluatedunder Part 15. MSHA intends to continue the current practice of treatinginformation on product specifications and performance as proprietary informationand will protect its disclosure to the fullest extent consistent with TheFreedom of Information Act, F.O.I.A. (5 U.S.C. 552). Under the final rule,MSHA will notify the applicant of requests for product information receivedby the Agency and will provide the manufacturer the opportunity to presentits position on disclosure. Information identified by the manufactureras proprietary will not be disclosed, unless, as provided by F.O.I.A.,MSHA determines that disclosure will further the public interest and willnot impede the discharge of any of the functions of the Agency. No objectionswere raised by commenters to this provision. Provisions from the existing regulation concerning MSHA publication oflists and other information on approved explosives are not included inthe final rule. The dissemination of information that is nonconfidentialneed not be addressed by these regulations. However, MSHA intends to continueto provide the mining community with this information. Section 15.10 Post-approval product audit. This section is derived from existing andSection;15.20 and from provisionson post-approval product audit contained in the Agency's approval rulemakingin 30 CFR Part 7. As was indicated in the preamble to proposed Part 15,it maintains a consistent approach on the issue of product audits withthat outlined in Part 7. The final rule provides that approved explosives and sheathed explosiveunits be subject to periodic audit by MSHA for the purpose of determiningconformity with the technical requirements upon which the approval wasbased. This aspect of the final rule, by providing a mechanism for independentevaluation by MSHA of approved products on a random basis, complementsthe quality assurance provision that requires approval-holders to manufacturetheir explosive products as approved. Moreover, it is consistent with recommendationsfrom internal reviews of MSHA's approval program. Approved explosives or sheathed units audited by MSHA will be selectedby the Agency as representative of those distributed for use in mines.When an approved explosives product is requested by MSHA for audit fromthe approval-holder, the Agency will examine and evaluate it and conductany testing necessary at the Bureau of Mines testing facility. This reflectsa change from the proposal which allowed for the audit to occur at a ``mutuallyagreeable site'' since manufacturers indicated that they do not have adequatefacilities for testing explosives and sheathed units. Approval-holders,however, will be notified by MSHA of the time for any audit-related testingof approved explosives or sheathed explosive units to allow them an opportunityto witness such tests. In determining which approved explosives or sheathed explosive units willbe subject to audit at any particular time, MSHA will consider a varietyof factors such as whether the manufacturer has previously produced theapproved product or similar products, whether the approved product is newor part of a new product line, or whether the approved product is intendedfor a unique application or limited distribution. Other considerationsmay include product complexity, the manufacturer's previous product auditresults, product population in the mining community, and the time sincethe last audit or since the product was first approved.Several commenters expressed concern over the proposal's requirement thatexplosives and sheathed explosive units selected from the field for auditingmeet the same technical requirements as required for approval. This isa change from existing regulations which test field samples under lessstringent criteria and allows for some field degradation such as in airgap sensitivity. It is important for explosive products available for usein underground gassy mine atmospheres to, at all times, be in compliancewith the technical requirements on which approval is based without regardto the age of the product or the length of time the explosive or sheathedunit has been stored in the field. This is consistent with the approachtaken in all of MSHA's other approval programs where audited products,including consumable items such as flame-resistant hydraulic fluid, mustmeet all the technical requirements upon which approval was granted. Commentershave presented no evidence during rulemaking to show that this is technicallyinfeasible. If manufacturers believe that their products degrade sufficientlyover time so they cannot continue to meet the technical requirements thenthey should provide a shelf or storage life for explosives or sheathedunits. MSHA will consider explosives with expired shelf dates to be deterioratedand therefore required to be removed by mine operators in accordance withandSection; 75.1328.Under the final rule, approved products can be obtained for audit fromthe approval-holder or from sources other than the manufacturer such asmine suppliers or distributors. The approval-holder may, however, onlybe required to provide one case of explosives or 25 sheathed explosivesonce a year, at no cost to MSHA, except for cause. MSHA can obtain productsfor audit from the approval-holder or other sources such as mine suppliersor distributors at any time at MSHA expense.Based on MSHA's experience, the Agency anticipates few instances in whichmore than this quantity of approved explosives or sheathed units will berequired ``for cause'' from any one manufacturer in any one year. Thereare circumstances, however under which an additional audit is appropriateto ascertain compliance with the technical requirements upon which an approvalwas based. Examples of such circumstances include verified complaints aboutthe safety of an approved product, evidence of product changes that havenot been approved, audit test results that warrant further testing to determinecompliance, and evaluation of corrective action taken by an approval-holder.Under these circumstances, the approval-holder must provide, at no costto MSHA, additional approved explosives or sheathed units so the Agencycan ensure that the approval-holder is meeting the obligation to manufacturethem as approved.Several commenters indicated that shipping small quantities of explosiveswould impose unreasonable costs on manufacturers because most major carriersbase their tariffs on a 7,500- or 10,000-pound minimum for shipment ofClass A explosives. When shipment of explosives or sheathed explosive unitsis necessary for audit, MSHA believes that most approval-holders will shipthem in the same vehicles as other shipments of explosives to customers,their regional supply magazines, or to the Bureau of Mines.When discrepancies are found during MSHA audits of approved products, MSHAwill require that the manufacturer take all necessary corrective actions.These actions could include, but are not limited to, the approval-holderrecalling the lot or batch of explosives or sheathed units or issuing usersnotices. Revocation of the approval by MSHA may result when discrepanciesin approved products are not successfully corrected.A new paragraph (d) has been added to andSection; 15.10 of the final ruleto address commenters' questions regarding the auditing of previously approvedexplosives. It provides that explosives approved under regulations in effectprior to the effective date of this rule shall conform to the provisionson field samples set forth in those regulations (See 30 CFR Part 15, 1987Edition).Section 15.11 Revocation.This section is derived from existing andSection; 15.16 and from the provisionon revocation in 30 CFR Part 7. It is indentical to the revocation sectionin Part 7 as MSHA believes that all approval-holders must be accorded thesame rights and subject to the same process regardless of the approvalregulations under which the approval was granted.The final rule provides that MSHA may revoke an approval granted underPart 15 whenever an explosive or sheathed explosive unit fails to meetthe applicable technical requirements specified in Subpart B or C or createsa hazard when used in a mine. Commenters recommended that the revocationprocedures require MSHA to fully describe the cause or reason for a revocationaction, and that the procedures include an appeal process for the approval-holderto challenge the basis for such action. The Agency recognizes that an MSHAapproval is important to the marketability of a product used in the miningindustry. For this reason it has been MSHA's practice to treat approval-holdersas ``licensees'' under the Administrative Procedure Act (APA). Consistentwith this practice, the final rule provides that approval-holders be accordedcertain protections prior to revocation of an approval. These include beingprovided with (1) A written notice of the Agency's intent to revoke a productapproval, with an explanation of the reasons for the proposed revocation,(2) an opportunity to demonstrate or achieve compliance with the technicalrequirements for approval, and (3) an opportunity for a hearing upon request.Also in accord with the APA is the final rule provision which permits MSHAto suspend an approval, without prior notification to the approval-holder,if a product poses an imminent hazard to the safety or health of miners.Under such circumstances, an approval may be suspended immediately to protectthe safety and health of any affected miners. Upon suspension of an approval,the product involved is no longer approved and MSHA will require mine operatorsto withdraw the product from use during the course of any suspension. MSHAwill also immediately advise approval-holders of any suspension so effectivecorrective action can be started as soon as possible.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart B_Explosives</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Section 15.20 Technical requirements.</ITAG>This section is derived from existing andSection;andSection; 15.10, 15.11,15.12 and 15.21, except for paragraphs (g)(1), and (g)(2), which are new.Section 15.20 of the final rule sets forth the technical requirements forapproval of explosives.Paragraph (a) requires the chemical composition of the explosive, as determinedby MSHA analysis, to conform to the composition furnished by the applicant.If in conformance, the applicant's composition description is incorporatedinto the approval and is the standard to determine compliance with theapproval during MSHA audits. One commenter questioned why two sets of tolerances were necessary andsuggested that the chemical composition of explosives be required to meetonly the tolerances specified in andSection; 15.21. The tolerances set inandSection; 15.21 represent a baseline standard of variation which all explosivessubmitted for approval must meet, regardless of their chemical composition.However, the particular mixture of ingredients in an explosive may requiretighter tolerances for the explosive to perform safely and for the purposedesigned. Based on its data and knowledge of the technical functioningof the explosive involved, the manufacturer is in the best position toprovide these mixture-specific tolerances. Therefore, the final rule requiresthat the chemical composition of an explosive meet the tolerances furnishedby the applicant in addition to the tolerances specified in andSection; 15.21.Paragraph (b) requires the explosive to detonate completely in the rate-of-detonationtest. This test is intended to determine whether the explosive has a tendencyto misfire or partially detonate. The test is conducted on a 50-inch columnof 1\1/4\ inch diameter cartridges and on the same quantity of the smallestdiameter cartridge less than 1\1/4\ inch submitted by the applicant. Under the proposal the rate-of-detonation test was to be conducted usinga test detonator without a booster to initiate all explosives submittedfor approval. The proposed rule eliminated the use of a booster in additionto a test detonator to initiate gelatinous explosives because boosterswere not used in the mine environment. However, commenters stated thatthe use of boosters with gelatinous explosives yields more reproducibleresults in laboratory testing with regard to detonation velocity and recommendedtheir continued use. Accordingly, the rate-of-detonation test has beenmodified in the final rule to specify the use of a 60-gram tetryl pelletbooster for testing of gelatinous explosives. Some commenters also suggested that the rate-of-detonation test be performedat the minimum firing temperature of the explosive since explosives testedat temperatures below this level could result in incomplete detonationor erratic rate of detonation. The effect of temperature on explosivesis better evaluated under the air-gap sensitivity requirements in andSection;15.20(c) than in subparagraph (b) on rate of detonation. The air-gap testprovides a more stringent measure of the explosive's ability to detonateas it is designed to ensure that a product, at its minimum firing temperature,will propagate the gap or space between explosive cartridges. This is incontrast to the rate-of-detonation test where cartridges are next to eachother in a column. Therefore, the final rule continues to provide thatthe rate-of-detonation test be conducted at an ambient temperature between68 and 86 anddegrees;F.Paragraph (c) requires that the air-gap sensitivity of the explosives beat least 2 inches at the minimum firing temperature and at least 3 inchesat a temperature between 68 and 86 anddegrees;F. This requirement enablesMSHA to evaluate whether the explosive will transmit detonation acrossa small air gap to another explosive cartridge in the column. The air-gapsensitivity is determined in the explosion-by-influence test using the7-inch cartridge method. The 7-inch cartridge method is conducted withtwo 8-inch cartridges. One inch is cut off the end of each cartridge. Thecartridges are placed in a paper tube, the cut ends facing each other withthe appropriate 2-inch or 3-inch air gap between them. Then, one cartridgeis fired to test the effect of the detonation on the other. This test methodrepresents a modification of the existing halved-cartridge method. A comment from one manufacturer suggested retaining the existing halved-cartridgemethod of conducting the explosion-by-influence test rather than usingthe 7-inch cartridge method. MSHA proposed changing to the 7-inch methodbecause use of a nearly whole cartridge better simulates actual conditionsthat may occur in the mining environment. This was not disputed by thecomments and thus, the explosion-by-influence test in the final rule willbe performed using the 7-inch cartridge method. Recommendations were also received from commenters to specify the papertube used in the test: The weight and type of paper; the length and widthof the sheet of paper; and the number of wraps of paper. This additionalspecification, they stated, would help ensure that tests are conducteduniformly. MSHA disagrees that variations in the paper tube specificationscould significantly affect the repeatability of tests and therefore hasnot included such detailed specifications in the final rule.The final rule, like the proposal, recognizes different sensitivities inthe air-gap test at different temperatures. Under andSection; 15.20(c) anair-gap sensitivity of 2 inches is required at the minimum product firingtemperature and 3 inches required at temperatures of 68 to 85 anddegrees;F.This is consistent with existing andSection;andSection; 15.12 and 15.21, whichrequire an air-gap sensitivity of 3 inches in the initial approval test,but allows an air-gap sensitivity of 2 inches for field samples of approvedexplosives. Several commenters recommended specifying a 2-inch air gapat a temperature between 68 and 86 anddegrees;F to be used in any post-approvalproduct audit of explosives. As was explained in the earlier preamble discussionon this issue in andSection; 15.10 Post Approval Product Audit, it is importantfor explosives available for use in gassy underground mines to, at alltimes, be in compliance with the technical requirements on which approvalis based regardless of the age of the product or the length of time theexplosives or sheathed unit has been stored in the field. As a result,the final rule requires products audited under andSection; 15.10 to meetthe same 3 and 2-inch air-gap sensitivity as is required for the originalapproval testing.The minimum product firing temperature at which the air-gap sensitivitywill be conducted is either that proposed by the applicant or 41 anddegrees;F,whichever is lower. Thus, under the final rule, explosives will be requiredto perform adequately at a temperature as low as 41 anddegrees;F. If specifiedby the applicant, the explosives will be tested at a lower temperature.The lowest temperature at which the explosive passes the test will be specifiedin the approval.A further comment recommended exempting unit charges or cartridges fromthe air-gap sensitivity requirement in andSection; 15.20(c). Unit chargesor cartridges would be a package configuration designed to require thatonly one cartridge or continuous charge be loaded in a borehole. With onlyone cartridge or continuous charge in a borehole, the air-gap sensitivity,cartridge to cartridge would not be a factor in performance. Such unitcharges or cartridges could still be used with single cartridges whichmay present the potential for an air gap to exist when loaded into a borehole.This could also occur with a continuous cartridge depending on its length.Paragraph (d) specifies the performance required for an explosive in gallerytest 7. The test demonstrates whether the explosive will ignite an explosivemixture of methane and air. Gallery test 7 is conducted by firing, oneat a time from the borehole of a steel cannon, at least 20 explosive chargesof varying weights. The explosives are primed with a test detonator andstemmed and tamped. This test is conducted in air containing 7.7 to 8.3percent natural gas and at a temperature between 68 and 86 anddegrees;F.A commenter suggested that gallery test 7 and other gallery tests be performedon samples of explosives identical to those intended to be marketed foruse in underground mines. MSHA agrees and has addressed this concern byspecifying that gallery test 7 be conducted on explosives that includewrappers and seals.The test procedure in both gallery tests 7 and 8 calls for tamping of theexplosive prior to firing. Commenters generally objected to the tamping,noting that tamping is not permitted in the mines. In addition, they indicatedthat tamping can affect the rheology and sensitivity of explosives andsuggested two alternatives for revising andSection; 15.20 (d) and (e). Oneoption was to provide larger diameter samples for testing and eliminatetamping altogether. The other alternative was to continue tamping, butpermit the applicant to provide larger diameter cartridges for testingexplosives where the rheology or sensitivity of the explosive could beadversely affected by tamping. While mine operators are prohibited fromtamping the explosives, they need to tamp the stemming to fill the cross-sectionof the borehole as required by the Part 75 explosives safety standards.Such tamping of the stemming material has the potential of putting pressureon the column of explosives. Also, Bureau of Mines research shows thatcrushing explosive cartridges to fill a borehole increases the risk forignition of methane during blasting as compared to loading cartridges ina continuous train without crushing. The tamping of explosives in the gallerytests provides a factor of safety based on experimental studies. Accordingly,the gallery test has been designed to take this into account and providethe necessary measure of safety should this situation occur.Paragraph (e) specifies the performance required for an explosive in gallerytest 8. The test demonstrates whether the explosive will ignite an explosivemixture of methane and air in which bituminous coal dust has been predispersed.The test is conducted by firing, one at a time from the borehole of a steelcannon, at least 10 unstemmed explosive charges of varying weights. Theexplosives are primed with a test detonator and tamped. This test is conductedin 640 cubic feet of air containing 3.8 to 4.2 percent natural gas, intowhich 8 pounds of bituminous coal dust has been predispersed. The air isat a temperature between 68 and 86 anddegrees;F.Gallery test 8 in the final rule replaced existing gallery test 4, whichprovides for coal dust to be placed on shelves in the gallery, rather thanbeing predispersed. The new test conditions facilitate improved quantitativecomparisons of explosive incendivity. The test is also designed to bettersimulate conditions in the mining environment.Paragraph (f) establishes the requirements for the performance of an explosivein the pendulum-friction test. The test demonstrates whether the explosiveis unduly sensitive to impact and friction. The explosive is required toshow ``no perceptible reaction'' under the conditions of the test. ``Noperceptible reaction'', as used in the final rule, means the explosivedoes not burn, explode, or exhibit a local crackling. The test apparatusconsists of an ``A'' frame, a weighted pendulum to which a steel or hardfiber-faced shoe is attached, and a steel anvil. The explosive sample isplaced on the anvil and the pendulum is adjusted and released from a heightof 59 inches. Paragraph (g) is a revision and update of existing andSection; 15.12(f) andspecifies that the total volume equivalent to carbon monoxide (CO) of thetoxic gases produced by detonation of the explosive not exceed 2.5 cubicfeet per pound of explosive. In the preproposal, the Agency included thislimitation to be determined by the large chamber test in which the explosiveshall propagate completely. The large chamber test will be used under thisfinal rule. The existing requirement in andSection;15.12(f) that limits the volume ofpoisonous gases to 2.5 cubic feet per pound of explosive was not retainedin the proposal. This was because MSHA believed, at that stage of the rulemakingprocess, that the hazards associated with toxic gases were appropriatelyaddressed in 30 CFR 75.301-2 which requires that concentrations of noxiousor poisonous gases not exceed the current threshold limit values (TLV)as specified by the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists.However, in the proposal the Agency sought information and data on anybenefits to be obtained by retention of this provision. Commenters opposed the deletion of the poisonous gas limitation statingthat they consider the limitation to be a valuable criterion in formulatingapproved explosives. In addition, they do not believe the limitation duplicatesthe requirements of 30 CFR 75.301-2, but instead ensures the effectivenessof the protections afforded by the Part 75 provision. Upon further analysis, MSHA has determined that a toxic gas limitationshould be retained. While current ventilation regulations address exposureto a number of toxic gases, including those associated with the detonationof explosives, MSHA's experience indicates that control of such gases producedby explosives is a particularly effective means for limiting the high concentrationsof toxic fumes that can be produced by detonation during blasting. Thatthe initial concentrations are particularly hazardous is exemplified byfour blasting-related accidents which occurred between 1980 and 1985 andresulted in 9 fatalities from exposure to toxic gases or fumes. Further,retaining a limitation will better enable MSHA to ensure compliance withshort-term exposure limits included in MSHA's air quality regulations.These considerations, coupled with strong support from commenters for retainingthe existing toxic gas provision, persuaded the Agency that a fume requirementis necessary to minimize hazards. Accordingly, MSHA has included a limitationon toxic gases in the final rule, but has modified the existing provisionso that the total volume is determined relative to carbon monoxide. Thefinal rule requirement follows, with minor editorial changes, the languagein the provision limiting toxic gases set out in the preproposal draftof this rulemaking. Paragraph (g)(1) discusses the large chamber test which is conducted sothe gaseous products from the detonation can be collected and analyzed.The large chamber test, which has a volume of approximately 1350 cubicfeet, replaces the Bichel and Crawshaw-Jones tests conducted under theexisting requirements. The explosive charge is stemmed and fired from acannon into the large chamber. This chamber test simulates conditions thatare more representative of actual conditions of use (stemmed, simulatedborehole, large expansion ratio) than the existing tests. The large chambertest also eliminates the use of two test apparatuses that are currentlyused for toxic gas determinations. Paragraph (g)(2) specifies the method for determining the effective toxicityof each toxic gas produced by relating the toxic gas to carbon monoxide.The method utilizes the threshold limit value, time weighted average (TLV-TWA)of the ingredient and the TLV-TWA of carbon monoxide. This method is derivedfrom the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists (ACGIH)following a combined component effect for mixtures. It is based on TLV'sincluded in the Chemical Substances section of the publication of the AmericanConference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists (ACGIH) entitled ``TLV's,Threshold Limit Values for 1988-1989 (`TLV Booklet').'' Under the method, the equivalent volume of each toxic gas produced relativeto CO is determined by multiplying the measured volume of gas by a conversionfactor. The conversion factor is equal to the TLV-TWA in parts-per-millionfor CO divided by the TLV-TWA for the toxic gas. The TLV-TWA conversionfactor for each gas for which MSHA will test is specified in Table I followingandSection;15.20(g)(2). The total volume equivalent to CO of the toxic gasesproduced by detonation of the explosive is the sum of the equivalent volumesof individual toxic gases. Paragraph (h) prescribes the tests to be conducted when a change is proposedto an approved explosive. A change involving cartridge diameter or lengthrequires MSHA examination to determine what tests, if any, are necessaryto evaluate the proposed change. A change to a cartridge diameter smallerthan the smallest diameter cartridge covered by the approval requires thatthe rate-of-detonation and explosion-by-influence tests be conducted. Thistesting enables MSHA to determine whether the approved explosive in thesmaller diameter cartridges will continue to perform in accordance withthe approval. A commenter suggested that the requirement for the explosion-by-influencetest be deleted because testing done for the original approval on 1\1/4\inch diameter cartridges is sufficient to ensure reliable detonation ofapproved explosives. In MSHA's experience, however, detonation is not alwaysreliable with certain explosive formulations when used in small diametercartridges and, therefore, the other tests are necessary to ensure thesafe performance of the modified explosive. Paragraph (i) gives MSHA the flexibility to approve an explosive that incorporatesnew technology or new applications of existing technology for which thetests or performance requirements of the final rule are not appropriate.An approval will be issued under this provision only if it is determinedby testing and evaluation that the explosive performs as safely as an explosivethat meets the requirements of this rule. MSHA will develop appropriatetests and performance requirements when the explosive is submitted forapproval. Variations in the test and evaluation methods will continue toemphasize the critical aspects of approved explosives, including stablechemical formulation and protection against ignition of an explosive atmosphere.This reflects MSHA's primary concern with the safe performance of explosivesin the mining environment, rather than with their design. Once MSHA approves an explosive under this section, the Agency will makethe modified tests and requirements used by MSHA to evaluate a particulartechnology available to manufacturers and other interested persons. Ifover a period of time MSHA receives a number of applications for the sametype of technology or newly adapted technology, MSHA will revise the explosiveapproval regulations through the rulemaking process to recognize such development.One commenter objected to inclusion of this provision in the proposed rulebecause approval of an explosive under tests and criteria not containedin the rule would be improper. The commenter indicated that all approvalrequirements should be promulgated through rulemaking. The flexibilityprovided by this provision is necessary to ensure that MSHA's explosivesapproval program can best serve the needs of safety in a timely manner.MSHA foresees use of this provision only to accommodate innovation in theformulation of explosives. At the time MSHA issues an approval under thissection, the Agency will make the criteria used to test and evaluate theproduct available to the mining community. Section 15.21 Tolerances for ingredients. This section is derived from existing andSection; 15.21 and establishes tolerancesfor each ingredient in an explosive based on the composition set forthin the approval of an explosive. It revises the existing provisions andadds tolerance requirements for aluminum and physical sensitizing agents.Newer types of explosives often contain these substances which can affectthe safe performance of an explosive and, therefore, these tolerances providea safety limit for variations in the explosive composition. The preproposal draft provision which would have established a toleranceof andplusmin;0.5 percent for aluminum and physical sensitizing agents wasnot included in the proposal. However, because aluminum and physical sensitizerscan affect the safe performance of an approved explosive, tolerance requirementsare necessary for these ingredients. Under the proposal, the applicantwas allowed to establish a tolerance for these ingredients, based on itsown technical data or experience. One commenter objected to allowing the applicant to set the tolerancesfor aluminum and physical sensitizers, stating that it was MSHA's responsibility,as the safety agency involved, to specify the limits of variation for theseingredients. Several commenters stated that physical sensitizers may bein the form of density control agents which are not necessarily added duringthe manufacturing process as a certain percentage of the explosive formulation.Also, since physical sensitizers combined differently may be based on thechemical formulation of the explosive, the manufacturer is in the bestposition to set the tolerances appropriate to the explosive compositioninvolved. Therefore, andSection; 15.21(a) specifies the tolerances for physicalsensitizers as those set by the applicant. However, small variations inthe quantity of aluminum can affect the safe performance of approved explosivesand, for this reason, it is important to closely control the allowabletolerance for aluminum. Commenters stated that the analytical methods usedto determine the aluminum content in an explosive are subject to greatervariations than andplusmin;0.5 percent and that inherent variations in themanufacturing process make adherence to this tolerance unrealistic. Uponfurther review, MSHA believes that it is technically attainable to achievea andplusmin;0.7 percent tolerance for aluminum. Bureau of Mines measurementsof aluminum in over 100 explosive samples show that less than 6 percentof the samples varied in tolerance by andplusmin;0.7 percent from the amountspecified by the individual companies. Additionally, limited data fromthe Bureau of Mines indicates that a several percent tolerance variationin aluminum may affect the safe performance of an approved explosive. Therefore,MSHA specifies a andplusmin;0.7 percent tolerance for aluminum in the finalrule. The final rule, based on the comments received, retains the tolerancesspecified in the existing standards for carbonaceous materials, moisture,and other ingredients contained in the explosive formulation. Explosivesmanufactured within these tolerances have historically proven to be safefor use. Section 15.22 Tolerance for performance, wrapper and specific gravity.This section is derived from existing andSection; 15.21 and prescribes thelimits of variation for rate-of-detonation and specific gravity of theexplosive for the weight of wrapper. The final rule is unchanged from theproposal and explosives are required to be manufactured in accordance witheach specified tolerance. <ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart C_Requirements for Approval of Sheathed Explosive Units orOther Explosive Units Designed To Be Fired Outside the Confines of a Borehole</ITAG>Section 15.30 Technical requirements. This section is new and sets forth the technical requirements for approvalof sheathed explosive units. The comments received generally favored theconcept of sheathed explosive units which are designed to be fired outsidethe confines of a borehold. One commenter stated that sheathed units willbe especially beneficial in roof fall recovery and construction work andwill provide a safe alternative to the hazards of firing ``open shots.''However, explosives manufacturers indicated in their comments that sinceno company is presently producing such units, they were unable to providecomments on Subpart C. Accordingly, the final requirements for sheathedexplosive units in Subpart C are unchanged from the proposal, except foridentical modifications in the drop test in andSection; 15.30(d) and thedetonation test in andSection; 15.30(f) to address the use of previouslyapproved explosives in sheathed units. Paragraph (a) specifies that the sheathed explosive unit contain no morethan 1\1/2\ pounds of approved explosive. This quantity of explosives isthe maximum amount used in the prototype units designed and tested by theBureau of Mines, which were found to be adequate for all situations wheresheathed explosives are likely to be used. Paragraph (b) requires that the chemical composition of the sheath, asdetermined by MSHA analysis, conform to the composition furnished by theapplicant. If in conformance, the applicant's composition description willbe incorporated in the approval and will then be the standard to determinecompliance with the approval during MSHA audits. Paragraph (c) sets forth requirements for the detonator well for the sheathedexplosive unit. The detonator well allows the detonator to be securelyinserted into the unit in order to provide for reliable detonation. Paragraph (d) specifies performance requirements for the outer coveringof the sheathed explosive unit to ensure that the unit is durable and appropriatefor use in underground mines. Units are subjected to a drop test to determinewhether the contents are susceptible to shifting or damage under conditionscomparable to those likely to be encountered in underground mines. Thetest is performed with the unit at the minimum product firing temperatureestablished for the explosive in the unit. For units with explosives approvedunder prior regulations, the drop test is performed at 41 anddegrees;F.Paragraph (e) specifies the performance requirements for sheathed explosiveunits in gallery tests 9, 10, 11, and 12. Under the final rule, sheathedexplosive units are subjected to 10 trials of each gallery test and arerequired to detonate completely without causing any ignition of methaneor coal dust. Gallery test 9 is conducted with 3 sheathed explosive units placed 2 feetapart on a concrete slab in an explosive methane-air atmosphere. The testprovides for evaluation under conditions simulating the blasting of fallenrock in an underground mine. Gallery test 10 is conducted with 3 sheathed explosive units in the samearrangement as in gallery test 9 in an explosive methane-air atmospherein which bituminous coal dust has been predispersed. Gallery test 11 is conducted with 3 sheathed explosive units arranged ina triangular pattern in a simulated crevice formed by two concrete slabs.The test is performed in an explosive methane-air atmosphere under conditionssimulating blasting of an overhanging roof slab. Gallery test 12 is conducted with 3 sheathed explosive units arranged ina triangular pattern in a corner formed by three steel plates. The testis performed in an explosive methane-air atmosphere under conditions simulatingblasting along a rib where compression and reflection of the explosiveshock wave are produced. A commenter suggested that gallery tests 9, 11,and 12 also be conducted in an atmosphere containing predispersed bituminouscoal dust. The commenter believed that, because of the possibility of sheathedexplosive units used in inadequately rock-dusted areas, the likelihoodof a dust ignition should be evaluated in approving the units. However,the methane-air and methane-coal dust air atmosphere specified in the gallerytests are easier to ignite than coal dust alone and provide a more stringenttests of the units incendivity than the test proposed by the commenter.Paragraph (f) requires that each of 10 sheathed explosive units detonatecompletely when fired at the minimum product firing temperature establishedfor the explosive used in the unit or at 41 anddegrees;F for units with previouslyapproved explosives. The test evaluates the effect of temperature on thesensitivity of the explosive and the performance of the flame-inhibitingmaterial in the unit. Paragraph (g) gives MSHA the flexibility to approve an explosive unit thatincorporates new technology or new applications of existing technologyfor which the tests or performance requirements of the final rule are notappropriate. An approval will be issued under this provision only if itis determined by testing and evaluation that the explosive unit performsas safely as one that meets the requirements of the proposed rule. Underthe final rule, MSHA will develop the appropriate tests and performancerequirements when the explosive unit is submitted for approval. Variationsin the test and evaluation methods will continue to emphasize the criticalaspects of sheathed explosive units, including stable chemical formulation,durable construction, and protection against ignition of an explosive atmosphere.This reflects MSHA's concern with the safe performance of explosive unitsdesigned to be fired outside the confines of a borehold in the mining environment,rather than with their design. Once MSHA approves an explosive unit under this section, the Agency willmake the modified tests and requirements used by MSHA to evaluate a particulartechnology available to manufacturers and other interested persons. Ifover a period of time MSHA receives a number of applications for the sametype of technology or newly adopted technology, MSHA will revise SubpartC through the rulemaking process to recognize such developments. One commenter objected to inclusion of this provision in the rule becauseapproval of an explosive unit under tests and criteria not contained inthe rule would be improper. The commenter indicated that all approval requirementsshould be promulgated through rulemaking. The flexibility provided by thisprovision is necessary to ensure that MSHA's explosives approval programbest serves the needs of safety in a timely manner. MSHA foresees use ofthis provision only to accommodate innovation in explosive units designedto be fired outside the confines of a borehole. Section 15.31 Tolerance of ingredients. This section is new and prescribes the limits of variation from the compositionof the sheath set forth in the approval of the sheathed explosive unit.Under the final rule, the tolerance for each ingredient in the sheath isrequired to be within the tolerance specified in Table II. The tolerancesspecified in Table II are derived from the existing requirements for ingredientsin explosives. MSHA believes that these tolerances are also appropriatefor sheathed explosive units. Section 15.32 Tolerance for weight of explosive, sheath, wrapper and specificgravity. This section is new and prescribes the limits of variation for certaincharacteristics of the sheathed explosive unit. Under the final rule, thesheathed explosive unit is required to be manufactured in accordance withthe specified tolerances. <ITAG tagnum="81">Derivation Table </ITAG>The following derivation table lists: (1) Each section number of the finalrule; and (2) the number of the existing regulation from which the finalrule is derived.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Derivation Table</T4><H1>New Section</H1><H1>Old Section</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">15.1 <D>15.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.2 <D>15.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.3 <D>15.9.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.4 <D>15.3, 15.4 and 15.15.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.5 <D>15.5 and 15.6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.6 <D>15.13.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.7 <D>15.14.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.8(a) <D>15.14.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.8(b) <D>New.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.9 <D>15.9 and 15.17.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.10 <D>15.20, 15.21.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.11 <D>15.16 and 15.22.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.20(a) <D>15.11, 15.12(a).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.20(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h)(3) <D>15.5(d), 15.10, 15.12 and 15.21.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.20(h)(1), (h)(2) <D>15.5(d).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.20(i) <D>New.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.21 <D>15.21.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.22 <D>15.21.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.30 <D>New.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.31 <D>New.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.32 <D>New.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Distribution Table</ITAG>The following distribution table lists: (1) Each section number of theexisting regulation; and (2) the section number of the final rule whichcontains provisions derived from the corresponding existing section.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s20,xs42</C><T4>Distribution Table</T4><H1>Old Section</H1><H1>New Section</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">15.1 <D>15.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.2 <D>15.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.3 <D>15.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.4 <D>Part 5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.5 <D>15.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.6(a), (b), (c), (d) <D>15.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.6(e) <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.7 <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.8 <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.9 <D>15.3 and 15.9.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.10(a)(1), (a)(2), (b)(1), (b)(3), (b)(4), (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(7)<D>15.20.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.10(b)(2) <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.11 <D>15.20(a).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.12(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h) <D>15.20.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.13 <D>15.6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.14(a), (b), (c) <D>15.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.14(d) <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.14(e) <D>15.8(a).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.15 <D>15.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.16 <D>15.11.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.17 <D>15.9.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.18 <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.19(a), (b), (c) <D>Part 75.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.19(d), (e) <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.20 <D>15.10.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.21(a)(1), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (b)(5) <D>15.10.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.21(a)(2), (b)(4) <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.21(b)(1), (b)(2) <D>15.21.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.21(b)(3), (b)(6), (b)(7) <D>15.22.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.22 <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.23 <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.24 <D>Removed.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">The Federal Mine Safety Code (as incorporated by section 15.19(e) <D>Part 75.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">III. Drafting Information</ITAG>The persons principally responsible for preparing this final rule are:Harry C. Verakis, Technical Support, MSHA; Helen Caraway, Office of Standards,Regulations, and Variances, MSHA; Edward C. Connor, Coal Mine Safety andHealth, MSHA; Richard Mainiero, Bureau of Mines, Department of Interior;and Linda B. Fort, Office of the Solicitor, Department of Labor.<ITAG tagnum="85">IV. Executive Order 12291 and Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>In accordance with Executive Order 12291, a regulatory flexibility analysishas been developed by the Agency for the purpose of comparing the costassociated with the final rule with the cost of existing requirements forapproval of explosives for underground coal mines. In this analysis, summarizedbelow, MSHA has determined that the final rule will not result in majorcost increases nor have an effect of $100,000,000 or more on the economy.Therefore, the rule is not within the criteria for a major rule and a RegulatoryImpact Analysis is not required.The Regulatory Flexibility Act requires that agencies evaluate and include,wherever possible, compliance alternatives that minimize any adverse impacton small businesses when developing regulatory proposals. MSHA revisionsto the existing rule update and clarify existing compliance requirements.Clarified compliance requirements which reflect advances in technologyshould benefit both large and small manufacturers of explosives.There are only seven companies who have been granted approvals for explosivesto be used in underground gassy mines. Three employ over 100 people andone is a multinational corporation. MSHA has determined that the finalrule will not have a significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities. Therefore, a regulatory flexibility analysis is notrequired. The Agency has, however, prepared an initial regulatory flexibilityanalysis and estimates that the annual cost for industry compliance withthe existing requirements is $204,125 compared to $277,170 for SubpartA (General Provisions) of the final rule. This represents a cost increaseof 36 percent when compared to the existing rule. Approximately 60 percentof this increase is due to the approval requirements for sheathed explosiveunits which are new. However, these costs will be offset totally by theprojected cost savings of $261,497 from the use of approved sheathed inunderground coal mines. In addition, allowing the use of sheathed unitsunderground should result in a reduction in blasting injuries. MSHA accidentdata from 1978 to 1987 reveals that there were 9 incidents which resultedin a total of four fatalities and 14 injuries caused by firing unconfinedshots.No fixed estimates were calculated for Subpart B as requests for such datarevealed that costs could range from $0 to approximately $500,000 dependingupon the ingredients used in explosives to meet the technical requirementsof the rule. Further, because Subpart C (Sheathed Explosive Units) representsa new requirement, cost estimates for commercial production of sheathedunits were not available.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>This final rule contains information collection requirements subject tothe Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq</T3>.Seven companies are listed by MSHA as having a total of about 100 differentapproved explosives. MSHA receives about 25 applications for some typeof explosives approval per year. Approximately 12 approvals are issuedeach year and about 13 applications are denied approval. MSHA estimatesthat applications for approval require an average of five hours labor toprepare. The burden per application remains essentially the same underthe final rule as under the existing requirement. MSHA estimates that thetotal annual recordkeeping burden under the final rule may increase slightly,primarily due to the introduction of sheathed explosive units. However,the total burden could be reduced if the total number of applications receivedremains at present levels.Paperwork requirements for Part 15 are approved under OMB control number1219-0066 which covers all of MSHA's equipment testing requirements in30 CFR Parts 11 through 36. Part 15, which relates to explosives approval,currently specifies that the applicant submit a statement in duplicateexplaining the nature and composition of the explosive. The final rulestreamlines the process by specifically stating the information requiredfor approval and extensions of approval. Information in duplicate is notrequired in the final rule. Moreover, the applicant will not be requiredto resubmit documentation duplicative of previously submitted informationwhen requesting subsequent approval of a similar product or an extensionof approval. Only information related to changes in the previously approvedexplosive or sheathed explosive unit is required, avoiding unnecessarypaperwork.The final rule retains the existing requirement that the wrapper of eachcartridge and each case of explosives be labeled with the brand or tradename and with a statement that the explosive is approved by MSHA. The finalrule also extends these requirements to apply to sheathed explosive units.Added to the final rule is a requirement that each wrapper and case ofexplosives and sheathed units be marked with the test detonator strengthand the minimum product firing temperature. Absent a Federal requirement,approval-holders would label explosive cartriduges, sheathed explosiveunits and cases with the brand or trade name and would need to purchasenew plates to change the name of new formulations prior to marketing. MSHAestimates that the cost of the wrapper is essentially the same with orwithout the words ``MSHA Approved Explosive'', the test detonator strength,and the minimum product firing temperature. MSHA, therefore, has associatedno cost with the requirement that the label include these items.Prior to commercial production, manufacturers conduct exhaustive teststo evaluate the performance of explosives under a variety of field conditions.Manufacturers typically include design aspects in explosive formulationsso the products will properly function over the range of temperatures thatmay be encountered in blasting operations in underground coal mines. Characteristicsrelated to minimum product firing temperature are part of the manufacturer'sdesign parameters for explosives and such data is presently available inproduct technical information and literature.The existing requirement for approval holder to provide a case-insert,warning the user that the explosive is approved only when used in conformancewith the requirements of Part 15, is not included in the final rule. MSHAbelieves that requirements governing the use of explosives are appropriatelyincluded in related safety standards and should not be addressed in requirementsfor approval of explosives. Since the final rule deletes this case-insertrequirement, the total annual cost savings would be about $2400.The final rule adds a new requirement that approval holders report to MSHAany knowledge of the distribution of approved explosives or sheathed explosiveunits not meeting the specifications of the approval. Few manufacturedlots of explosives, which do not meet the specifications of the approval,are distributed inadvertently. Based on a worst case analysis, MSHA estimatesthat each approval holder may need to report the distribution of explosivesor sheathed units which do not meet specifications once per year. The totalcost for these reports would be about $100.In accordance with section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980(Title 44 U.S.C. Chapter 35), the collection of information requirementscontained in the final rule have been approved by OMB under control number1219-0066.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 30 CFR Part 15</ITAG>Administrative practice and procedure, Explosives, Mine Safety and health,Underground mining.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: November 9, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David C. O'Neal,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Deputy Assistant Secretary for Mine Safety and Health.</ITAG>Accordingly, Chapter I of Title 30, Code of Federal Regulation is amendedby revising Part 15 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 15_REQUIREMENTS FOR APPROVAL OF EXPLOSIVES AND SHEATHED EXPLOSIVEUNITS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.1 Purpose and effective dates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.2 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.3 Observers at tests and evaluations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.4 Application procedures and requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.5 Test samples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.6 Issuance of approval.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.7 Approval marking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.8 Quality assurance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.9 Disclosure of information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.10 Post-approval product audit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.11 Revocation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Requirements for Approval of Explosives</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.20 Technical requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.21 Tolerances for ingredients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.22 Tolerances for performance, wrapper, and specific gravity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Requirements for Approval of Sheathed Explosive Units orOther Explosive Units Designed to be Fired Outside the Confines of a Borehole</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.30 Technical requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.31 Tolerances for ingredients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">15.32 Tolerances for weight of explosive, sheath, wrapper, and specificgravity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>30 U.S.C. 957.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and effective dates.</ITAG>This part sets forth the requriements for approval of explosives and sheathedexplosive units to be used in underground coal mines and certain undergroundmetal and nonmetal gassy mines and is effective January 17, 1989. Thosemanufacturers proceeding under the provisions of the previous regulationmay file requests for approval or extension of approval of explosives underthat regulation until November 20, 1989. After November 20, 1989, all requestsfor approval or extension of approval of explosives or sheathed explosiveunits shall be made in accordance with Subpart A and the applicable subpartof this part. Explosives issued an approval under regulations in placeprior to January 17, 1989, and in compliance with those regulations, maycontinue to be manufactured and marked as approved as long as no changeto the explosive is made.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>The following definitions apply in this part.<T3>Applicant</T3>. An individual or organization that manufactures orcontrols the production of an explosive or an explosive unit and that appliesto MSHA for approval of that explosive or explosive unit.<T3>Approval. </T3>A document issued by MSHA which states that an explosiveor explosive unit has met the requirements of this part and which authorizesan approval marking identifying the explosive or explosive unit as approvedas permissible.<T3>Explosive</T3>. A substance, compound, or mixture, the primary purposeof which is to function by explosion.<T3>Extension of approval</T3>. A document issued by MSHA which statesthat the change to an explosive or explosive unit previously approved byMSHA under this part meets the requirements of this part and which authorizesthe continued use of the approval marking after the appropriate extensionnumber has been added.<T3>Minimum product firing temperature</T3>. The lowest product temperatureat which the explosive or explosive unit is approved for use under thispart.<T3>Post-approval product audit</T3>. Examination, testing, or both, byMSHA of approved explosives or explosive units selected by MSHA to determinewhether they meet the technical requirements and have been manufacturedas approved.<T3>Sheath</T3>. A chemical compound or mixture incorporated in a sheathedexplosive unit and which forms a flame inhibiting cloud on detonation ofthe explosive.<T3>Sheathed explosive unit.</T3> A device consisting of an approved orpermissible explosive covered by a sheath encased in a sealed coveringand designated to be fired outside the confines of a borehole.<T3>Test detonator</T3>. An instantaneous detonator that has a strengthequivalent to that of a detonator with a base charge of 0.40-0.45 gramsPETN.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Observers at tests and evaluations.</ITAG>Only personnel of MSHA and the Bureau of Mines, U.S. Department of theInterior, representatives of the applicant, and such other persons as agreedupon by MSHA and the applicant shall be present during tests and evaluationsconducted under this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application procedures and requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Application</T3>. Requests for an approval or an extension of approvalunder this part shall be sent to: U.S. Department of Labor, Mine Safetyand Health Administration, Approval and Certification Center, P.O. Box251, Industrial Park Road, Triadelphia, West Virginia 26059.(b) <T3>Fees</T3>. Fees calculated in accordance with Part 5 of this Titleshall be submitted in accordance with andSection; 5.40.(c) <T3>Original approval for explosives</T3>. Each application for approvalof an explosive shall include_(1) A technical description of the explosive, including the chemical compositionof the explosive with tolerances for each ingredient;(2) A laboratory number or other suitable designation identifying the explosive.The applicant shall provide the brand or trade name under which the explosivewill be marketed prior to issuance of the approval;(3) The lengths and diameters of explosive cartridges for which approvalis requested; (4) The proposed minimum product firing temperature of the explosive; and(5) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant's representativeresponsible for answering any questions regarding the application.(d) <T3>Original approval for sheathed explosive units.</T3> Each applicationfor approval of a sheathed explosive unit shall include_(1) A technical description of the sheathed explosive unit which includesthe chemical composition of the sheath, with tolerances for each ingredient,and the types of material used for the outer covering;(2) The minimum thickness weight, and specific gravity of the sheath andouter covering;(3) The brand or trade name, weight, specific gravity, and minimum productfiring temperature of the approved explosive to be used in the unit;(4) The ratio of the weight of the sheath to the weight of the explosive;and (5) The name, address and telephone number of the applicant's representativeresponsible for answering any questions regarding the application.(e) <T3>Subsequent approval of a similar explosive or sheathed explosive unit.</T3>Each application for approval of an explosive or sheathed explosive unitsimilar to one for which the applicant already holds an approval shallinclude_(1) The approval number of the explosive or sheathed explosive unit whichmost closely resembles the new one;(2) The information specified in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this sectionfor an original approval, as applicable, except that any document whichis the same as the one listed by MSHA in the prior approval need not besubmitted but shall be noted in the application; and (3) An explanation of all change from the existing approval.(f) <T3>Extension of the approval.</T3> Any change in an approved explosiveor sheathed explosive unit from the documentation on file at MSHA thataffects the technical requirements of this Part shall be submitted forapproval prior to implementing the change. (1) Each application for an extension of approval shall include_(i) The MSHA-assigned approval number for the explosive or sheathed explosiveunit for which the extension is sought; (ii) A description of the proposed change to the approved explosive orsheathed explosive unit; and (iii) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant's representativeresponsible for answering any questions regarding the application.(2) MSHA will determine what tests, additional information, samples, ormaterial, if any, are required to evaluate the proposed change.(3) When a change involves the chemical composition of an approved explosiveor sheathed explosive unit which affects the firing characteristics, MSHAmay require the explosive or sheathed explosive unit to be distinguishedfrom those associated with the former composition.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1219-0066)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Test samples.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Submission of test samples. </T3>(1) The applicant shall not submitexplosives or sheathed explosive units to be tested until requested todo so by MSHA. (2) The applicant shall submit 70 pounds of 1\1/4\-inch diameter explosivesand additional cartridges in the amount of 3200 divided by the length ininches, except for cartridges 12, 20 and greater than 36 inches long. Theapplicant shall submit 70 pounds and additional cartridges in the amountof 3800 divided by the length in inches for cartridges 12, 20 and greaterthan 36 inches long. (3) If approval is requested for cartridges in diameters less than 1-\1/4\inches, the applicant shall submit a number of cartridges equal to 1800divided by the length in inches, except for cartridges 12, 20 and greaterthan 36 inches long. The applicant shall submit cartridges in the amountof 2200 divided by the length in inches for cartridges 12, 20 and greaterthan 36 inches long. (4) If approval is requested for cartridges in diameters larger than 1-\1/4\inches, the applicant shall submit an additional 10 cartridges of eachlarger diameter. (5) If approval is requested for cartridges in more than one length, theapplicant shall submit an additional 10 cartridges for each additionallength and diameter combination. (6) Each applicant seeking approval of sheathed explosive units shall submit140 units. (b) <T3>Condition and composition.</T3> Explosives and sheathed explosive unitswill not be tested that_(1) Contain chlorites, chlorates, or substances that will react over anextended time and cause degradation of the explosive or sheathed explosiveunit;(2) Are chemically unstable; (3) Show leakage; (4) Use aluminum clips to seal the cartridge; (5) Contain any combination of perchlorate and aluminum; (6) Contain more than 5 percent perchlorate; or (7) Contain any perchlorate and less than 5 percent water. (c) <T3>Storage.</T3> Explosives and sheathed explosive units shall be storedin a magazine for at least 30 days before gallery tests are conducted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of approval.</ITAG>(a) MSHA will issue an approval or a notice of the reasons for denyingapproval after completing the evaluation and testing provided for by thispart. (b) An applicant shall not advertise or otherwise represent an explosiveor sheathed explosive unit as approved until MSHA has issued an approval.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Approval marking.</ITAG>(a) An approved explosive or sheathed explosive unit shall be marketedonly under the brand or test name specified in the approval. (b) The wrapper of each cartridge and each case of approved explosivesshall be legibly labeled with the following: the brand or trade name, ``MSHAApproved Explosive'', the test detonator strength, and the minimum productfiring temperature.(c) The other covering of each sheathed explosive unit and each case ofapproved sheathed explosive units shall be legibly labeled with the following:the brand or trade name, ``MSHA Approved Sheathed Explosive Unit'', thetest detonator strength, and the minimum product firing temperature.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1219-0066)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Quality assurance.</ITAG>(a) Applicants granted an approval or an extension of approval under thispart shall manufacture the explosive or sheathed explosive unit as approved.(b) Applicants shall immediately report to the MSHA Approval and CertificationCenter, any knowledge of explosives or sheathed explosive units that havebeen distributed that do not meet the specifications of the approval. <ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1219-0066) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disclosure of information. </ITAG>(a) All information concerning product specifications and performance submittedto MSHA by the applicant shall be considered proprietary information. (b) MSHA will notify the applicants of requests for disclosure of informationconcerning its explosives or sheathed explosive units and shall give theapplicant an opportunity to provide MSHA with a statement of its positionprior to any disclosure. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Post-approval product audit. </ITAG>(a) Approved explosives and sheathed explosive units shall be subject toperiodic audits by MSHA for the purpose of determining conformity withthe technical requirements upon which the approval was based. Any approvedexplosive or sheathed explosive unit which is to be audited shall be selectedby MSHA and be representative of those distributed for use in mines. Theapproval-holder may obtain any final report resulting from such audit.(b) No more than once a year, except for cause, the approval-holder, atMSHA's request, shall make one case of explosives or 25 sheathed explosiveunits available at no cost to MSHA for an audit. The approval-holder mayobserve any tests conducted during this audit. (c) An approved explosive or sheathed explosive unit shall be subject toaudit for cause at any time MSHA believes that it is not in compliancewith the technical requirements upon which the approval was based. (d) Explosives approved under regulations in effect prior to January 17,1989, shall conform to the provisions on field samples set out in thoseregulations (See 30 CFR Part 15, 1987 Edition). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revocation. </ITAG>(a) MSHA may revoke for cause an approval issued under this part if theexplosive or sheathed explosive unit_ (1) Fails to meet the applicable technical requirements; or (2) Creates a hazard when used in a mine.(b) Prior to revoking an approval, the approval-holder shall be informedin writing of MSHA's intention to revoke. The notice shall_ (1) Explain the specific reasons for the proposed revocation; and (2) Provide the approval-holder an opportunity to demonstrate or achievecompliance with the product approval requirements.(c) Upon request, the approval-holder shall be afforded an opportunityfor a hearing. (d) If an explosive or sheathed explosive unit poses an imminent hazardto the safety or health of miners, the approval may be immediately suspendedwithout a written notice of the agency's intention to revoke. The suspensionmay continue until the revocation proceedings are completed.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Requirements for Approval of Explosives</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Technical requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Chemical composition</T3>. The chemical composition of the explosiveshall be within the tolerances furnished by the applicant.(b) <T3>Rate-of-detonation test</T3>. The explosive shall propagate completelyin the rate-of-detonation test. The test is conducted at an ambient temperaturebetween 68 and 86 anddegrees;F. Nongelatinous explosives are initiated witha test detonator only, while gelatinous explosives are initiated with atest detonator and a 60-gram tetryl pellet booster. The test is conductedon_(1) A 50-inch column of 1\1/4\ inch diameter cartridges; and(2) A 50-inch column of the smallest diameter cartridges less than 1\1/4\inches submitted for testing.(c) <T3>Air-gap sensitivity</T3>. The air-gap sensitivity of the explosiveshall be at least 2 inches at the minimum product firing temperature and3 inches at a temperature between 68 and 86 anddegrees;F, and the explosiveshall propagate completely.(1) Air-gap sensitivity of the explosive is determined in the explosion-by-influencetest using the 7-inch cartridge method. The air-gap sensitivity is determinedfor 1\1/4\ inch diameter cartridges and each cartridge diameter smallerthan 1\1/4\ inches. Explosives are initiated with a test detonator.(2) The 7-inch cartridge method is conducted with two 8-inch cartridges.One inch is cut off the end of each cartridge. The cartridges are placedin a paper tube, the cut ends facing each other, with the appropriate 2-inchor 3-inch air gap between them. The test is conducted at a temperaturebetween 68 and 86 anddegrees;F and at the minimum product firing temperatureproposed by the applicant, or 41 anddegrees;F, whichever is lower. The testtemperature at which the explosive propagates completely will be specifiedin the approval as the minimum product firing temperature at which theexplosive is approved for use.(d) <T3>Gallery Test 7. </T3>The explosive shall yield a value of at least450 grams for the lower 95 percent confidence limit (L<T2>95</T2>) on the weight for 50 percent probability of ignition (W<T2>50</T2>) in gallery test 7 and shall propagate completely. The L<T2>95</T2> and W<T2>50</T2> values for the explosive are determined by using the Brucetonup-and-down method. A minimum of 20 trials are made with explosive chargesof varying weights, including wrapper and seals. Each charge is primedwith a test detonator, then tamped and stemmed with one pound of dry-milledfire clay into the borehole of a steel cannon. The cannon is fired intoair containing 7.7 to 8.3 percent of natural gas. The air temperature isbetween 68 and 86 anddegrees;F.(e) <T3>Gallery Test 8. </T3>The explosive shall yield a value of at least350 grams for the weight for 50 percent probability of ignition (W<T2>CDG</T2>) in gallery test 8 and shall propagate completely. The (W<T2>CDG</T2>) value for the explosive is determined using the Brucetonup-and-down method. A minimum of 10 tests are made with explosive chargesof varying weights, including wrapper and seals. Each charge is primedwith a test detonator, then tamped into the borehole of a steel cannon.The cannon is fired into a mixture of 8 pounds of bituminous coal dustpredispersed into 640 cubic feet of air containing 3.8 to 4.2 percent ofnatural gas. The air temperature is between 68 and 86 anddegrees;F.(f) <T3>Pendulum-friction test. </T3>The explosive shall show no perceptiblereaction in the pendulum-friction test with the hard fiber-faced shoe.Ten trials of the test are conducted by releasing the steel shoe from aheight of 59 inches. If there is evidence of sensitivity, the test is repeatedwith the hard fiber-faced shoe.(g)<T3> Toxic gases</T3>. The total volume equivalent to carbon monoxide (CO)of toxic gases produced by detonation of the explosive shall not exceed2.5 cubic feet per pound of explosive as determined in the large chambertest. The explosive shall propagate completely.(1) The large chamber test is conducted with a one-pound explosive charge,including wrapper and seal, primed with a test detonator. The explosivecharge is loaded into the borehole of a steel cannon, then tamped and stemmedwith one pound of dry-milled fire clay. The cannon is fired into the largechamber and the gaseous products resulting from detonation of the explosiveare collected and analyzed for toxic gases. At least two trials are conducted.(2) The equivalent volume of each toxic gas produced, relative to CO, isdetermined by multiplying the measured volume of the gas by a conversionfactor. The conversion factor is equal to the threshold limit value, timeweighted average (TLV-TWA) in parts-per-million for CO divided by the TLV-TWAfor the toxic gas. The TLV-TWA conversion factor for each gas for whichMSHA shall test is specified in Table I of this subpart. The total volumeequivalent to CO of the toxic gases produced by detonation of the explosiveis the sum of the equivalent volumes of the individual toxic gases.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table I._Conversion Factors For Toxic Gases</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[For Equivalent Volume Relative to Carbon Monoxide]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1>Toxic Gas</H1><H2>Conversion Factor</H2><H2>TLV-TWA (PPM)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Ammonia<D>2</D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbon Dioxide<D>0.01</D><D>5000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbon Monoxide<D>1</D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydrogen Sulfide<D>5</D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitric Oxide<D>2</D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen Dioxide<D>17</D><D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sulfur Dioxide<D>25</D><D>2</D></ITAG></ITAG>(h) <T3>Cartridge diameter and length changes</T3>. (1) For proposed changesto an approved explosive involving only cartridge diameter or length, MSHAwill determine what tests, if any, will be required.(2) When a proposed change to an approved explosive involves a smallerdiameter than that specified in the approval, the rate-of-detonation andair-gap sensitivity tests will be conducted.(3) No test will be conducted on cartridges with diameters the same asor smaller than those that previously failed to detonate in the rate-of-detonationtest.(i) <T3>New technology</T3>. MSHA may approve an explosive that incorporatestechnology for which the requirements of this subpart are not applicableif MSHA determines that the explosive is as safe as those which meet therequirements of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Tolerances for ingredients.</ITAG>Tolerances for each ingredient in an explosive, which are expressed asa percentage of the total explosive, shall not exceed the following:(a) Physical sensitizers: The tolerances established by the applicant;(b) Aluminum: andplusmin;0.7 percent;(c) Carbonaceous materials: andplusmin;3 percent; and(d) Moisture and ingredients other than specified in paragraphs (a), (b),and (c) of this section: The tolerances specified in Table II.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s60,10</C><T4>Table II._Tolerances For Moisture And Other Ingredients</T4><H1>Quantity of ingredients (as percent of total explosive or sheath)</H1><H1>Tolerance percent</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">0 to 5.0<D>1.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.1 to 10.0<D>1.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10.1 to 20.0<D>1.7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">20.1 to 30.0<D>2.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">30.1 to 40.0<D>2.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">40.1 to 50.0<D>2.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">50.1 to 55.0<D>2.8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">55.1 to 100.0<D>3.0</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Tolerances for performance, wrapper and specific gravity.</ITAG>(a) The rate of detonation of the explosive shall be within andplusmin;15percent of that specified in the approval.(b) The weight of wrapper per 100 grams of explosive shall be within andplusmin;2grams of that specified in the approval.(c) The apparent specific gravity of the explosive shall be within andplusmin;7.5percent of that specified in the approval.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Requirements for Approval of Sheathed Explosive Units orOther Explosive Units Designed to be Fired Outside the Confines of a Borehole</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Technical requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Quantity of explosive. </T3>The sheathed explosive unit shall containnot more than 1\1/2\ pounds of an approved or permissible explosive.(b) <T3>Chemical composition</T3>. The chemical composition of the sheath shallbe within the tolerances furnished by the applicant.(c) <T3>Detonator well. </T3>The sheathed explosive unit shall have a detonatorwell that_(1) Is protected by a sealed covering;(2) Permits an instantaneous detonator to be inserted in the unit withthe detonator completely embedded in the well;(3) Is provided with a means of securing the detonator in the well; and(4) Is clearly marked.(d) <T3>Drop test. </T3>The outer covering of the sheathed explosive unit shallnot tear or rupture and the internal components shall not shift positionor be damaged in the drop test.(1) The drop test is conducted on at least 10 sheathed explosive units.Each unit is dropped on its top, bottom, and edge from a height of 6 feetonto a concrete surface. For units with explosives approved with a minimumproduct firing temperature, the drop test is performed with the unit atthe minimum product firing temperature established for the explosive inthe unit. For units with explosives approved under regulations in effectprior to [the effective date of this rule], the drop test is performedwith the unit at 41 anddegrees;F.(2) At least four units which have been drop-tested shall be cut-open andexamined.(3) At least six units which have been drop-tested shall be subjected togallery tests 9 and 10 as provided in paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) of thissection.(e) <T3>Gallery tests. </T3>No sheathed explosive unit shall cause an ignitionin gallery tests 9, 10, 11, or 12. Ten trials in each gallery test shallbe conducted and each sheathed explosive unit shall propagate completelyin all tests.(1) Gallery test 9 is conducted in each trial with three sheathed explosiveunits placed in a row 2 feet apart. One of the trials is conducted withsheathed explosive units which have been subjected to the drop test asprovided in paragraph (d)(3) of this section. The units are placed on aconcrete slab, primed with test detonators and fired in air containing7.7 to 8.3 percent natural gas or 8.7 to 9.3 percent methane. The air temperatureis between 41 and 86 anddegrees;F.(2) Gallery test 10 is conducted in each trial with three sheathed explosiveunits placed in a row 2 feet apart. One of the trials is conducted withsheathed explosive units which have been subjected to the drop test asprovided in paragraph (d)(3) of this section. The units are placed on aconcrete slab, primed with test detonators and fired in air containing3.8 to 4.2 percent natural gas, or 4.3 to 4.7 percent methane, mixed with0.2 ounces per cubic foot of predispersed bituminous coal dust. The airtemperature is between 41 and 86 anddegrees;F.(3) Gallery test 11 is conducted in each trial with three sheathed explosiveunits arranged in a triangular pattern with the units in contact with eachother. The units are placed in a simulated crevice formed between two squareconcrete slabs, each measuring 24 inches on a side and 2 inches in thickness.The crevice is formed by placing one slab on top of the other and raisingthe edge of the upper slab at least 4 inches. The sheathed explosive unitsare primed with test detonators and fired in air containing 7.7 to 8.3percent natural gas or 8.7 to 9.3 percent methane. The air temperatureis between 41 and 86 anddegrees;F.(4) Gallery test 12 is conducted in each trial with three sheathed explosiveunits arranged in a triangular pattern with the units in contact with eachother. The units are placed in a corner formed by three square steel plates,each measuring 24 inches on a side and one inch in thickness. The sheathedexplosive units are primed with test detonators and fired in air containing7.7 to 8.3 percent natural gas or 8.7 to 9.3 percent methane. The air temperatureis between 41 and 86 anddegrees;F.(f) <T3>Detonation test. </T3>Each of ten sheathed explosive units shall propagatecompletely when fired at the minimum product firing temperature for theexplosive used in the unit or 41 anddegrees;F for units with explosives approvedunder regulations in effect prior to [insert the effective date of thisrule]. The units are initiated with test detonators.(g) <T3>New technology. </T3>MSHA may approve an explosive unit designed tobe fired outside the confines of a borehole that incorporates technologyfor which the requirements of this subpart are not applicable if MSHA determinesthat such explosive unit is as safe as those which meet the requirementsof this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Tolerances for ingredients.</ITAG>Tolerances established by the applicant for each ingredient in the sheathshall not exceed the tolerances specified in Table II andSection; 15.21 ofthis part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 15.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Tolerances for weight of explosive, sheath, wrapper, and specificgravity.</ITAG>(a) The weight of the explosive, the sheath, and the outer covering shalleach be within andplusmin;7.5 percent of that specified in the approval.(b) The ratio of the weight of the sheath to that of the explosive shallbe within andplusmin;7.5 percent of that specified in the approval.(c) The specific gravity of the explosive and sheath shall be within andplusmin;7.5percent of that specified in the approval.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-26410 Filed 11-17-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>